Hawaii statutes.
[§236E-5] Legislative
intent; application of Internal Revenue Code. (a) It is the intent of
this chapter, in addition to the essential purpose of raising revenue, to
conform the estate and generation-skipping transfer tax law of the State as
closely as possible to the Internal Revenue Code, in order to simplify the
filing of returns and minimize the taxpayers' burdens in complying with the
estate and generation-skipping transfer tax law. The rules and regulations,
forms, and procedures adopted and established under this chapter shall conform
as nearly as possible, unless there is good reason to the contrary, to the
rules and regulations, forms, and procedures adopted and established under the
Internal Revenue Code.

(b) The Internal Revenue Code, so far as made
operative by this chapter, is a statute adopted and incorporated by reference.
The Internal Revenue Code shall be applied using changes in nomenclature and
other language, including the omission of inapplicable language, where
necessary to effectuate the intent of this section. References to the
following terms in the Internal Revenue Code shall have the following meanings:

(1) "Secretary
or his delegate" means the director
of taxation or the director's duly authorized subordinates; and

(2) "Interest
at the underpayment rate" or "interest at the overpayment rate" means the interest rate set forth in section 231-39(b)(4) or section
231-23(d)(1), as the case may be. [L 2012, c 220,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next